Hawaii statutes.
§327K-2 [Provider] orders for
life-sustaining treatment form; execution; explanation; compliance; revocation.
(a) The following may execute a form:

(1) The patient;

(2) The patient's provider; and

(3) The legally authorized representative, but only if
the patient:

(A) Lacks capacity; or

(B) Has designated that the legally authorized
representative is authorized to execute the form.

The patient's provider may medically evaluate the
patient and, based upon the evaluation, may recommend new orders consistent
with the most current information available about the individual's health
status and goals of care. The patient's provider shall consult with the
patient or the patient's legally authorized representative before issuing any
new orders on a form. The patient or the patient's legally authorized
representative may choose to execute or not execute any new form. If a patient
is incapacitated, the patient's legally authorized representative shall consult
with the patient's provider before requesting the patient's provider to modify
treatment orders on the form. To be valid, a form shall be signed by the
patient's provider and the patient, or the patient's provider and the patient's
legally authorized representative. At any time, a patient, or, if incapacitated,
the patient's legally authorized representative, may request alternative
treatment that differs from the treatment indicated on the form.

(b) The patient's physician or a health care
provider shall explain to the patient the nature and content of the form,
including any medical intervention or procedures, and shall also explain the
difference between an advance health-care directive and the form. The form
shall be prepared by the patient's physician or a health care provider based on
the patient's preferences and medical indications.

(c) Any health care provider, including the
patient's physician, emergency medical services personnel, and emergency
physicians shall comply with a properly executed and signed form and treat the
patient according to the orders on the form; provided that compliance shall not
be required if the orders on the form request medically ineffective health care
or health care that is contrary to generally accepted health care standards.

(d) A patient having capacity, or, if the
patient is incapacitated, the patient's legally authorized representative, may
revoke a form at any time and in any manner that communicates intent to revoke.
[L 2009, c 186, pt of §1; am L 2014, c 154, §4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next